Missouri, session 2026, SB879.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 137.100, 153.030, 153.034, and
523.010, RSMo, are repealed and eight new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 67.5350, 137.100, 137.124,
153.030, 153.034, 393.172, 393.1120, and 523.010, to read as
follows:
67.5350. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Material amendment", any amendment to a permit
issued by a county commission to construct a solar farm
which:
(a) Changes the solar farm's generation type from one
type of utility facility to another;
(b) Increases the facility's nameplate capacity; or
(c) Changes the boundaries of the solar farm, unless
the new boundaries of the facility are completely within the
previous boundaries of the facility or the facility
components outside of the previous boundary are underground;
(2) "Solar farm", a group of photovoltaic
interconnected solar panels or arrays that convert sunlight
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 879 2
into electricity for the primary purpose of wholesale or
retail sales of generated electricity, including all on-site
equipment and facilities necessary for the proper operation
of the facility, such as electrical collection and
transmission lines, battery storage systems, transformers,
substations, and operations and maintenance facilities
within at least twenty continuous acres.
2. Prior to obtaining a certificate of public
convenience or necessity issued by the Missouri public
service commission, any person constructing a solar farm
shall first submit an application to the county commission
in each county where the solar farm is to be located.
3. The county commission of any county shall adopt an
order or ordinance requiring a permit to construct a solar
farm within specified boundaries located in whole or in part
in an unincorporated area of a county. Such permit shall
require the following:
(1) Any construction to be at least one thousand
linear feet from any church, school, or city, town, or
village limit, or any private residence or residential
property, including, but not limited to, a nursing home or a
senior living facility;
(2) Any construction to be at least three hundred
linear feet from any other property line, not listed under
subdivision (1) of this subsection; or
(3) Any construction to be at least two hundred and
fifty linear feet from any public road.
4. A permit under subsection 3 of this section shall
require noise levels not to exceed forty-five decibels at
any property line.
5. Within ninety days of receiving an application to
construct a solar farm, the county commission shall hold a

SB 879 3
public meeting before the issuance of any such permit to
construct a solar farm. Notice shall be provided at least
fourteen days prior to the public meeting. At the public
meeting, the applicant shall provide in writing the
following information:
(1) Maximum nameplate capacity of the solar farm;
(2) Safety measures to prevent any fire hazard on the
solar farm;
(3) Geographical area and number of acres of the solar
farm;
(4) Name, address, and telephone number of the owner
or operator of the solar farm;
(5) Notice that the county commission will accept
written comments from the public for a period of thirty days
on the construction of the solar farm; and
(6) The address of the office of the county commission.
6. No later than ninety days after the public meeting,
the county commission shall:
(1) Issue a permit to the applicant accepting the
construction proposal;
(2) Issue a permit to the applicant limiting the
boundaries of the proposed solar farm to a smaller
geographic area, completely within the geographic area
proposed by the applicant; or
(3) Deny the permit and prohibit the construction of
the solar farm by the applicant.
7. Any applicant intending to make a material
amendment once a permit is issued shall submit a new
application for a permit to the county commission.
8. The county commission shall require any applicant
who is issued a permit to obtain liability insurance in an

SB 879 4
amount sufficient to cover any damages which may arise from
the construction of the solar farm.
9. The Missouri public service commission shall not
issue a certificate of public convenience or necessity to
any applicant who did not receive a permit to construct a
solar farm from the county commission in each county where
the solar farm is to be located.
10. The county commission of any county where a solar
farm is proposed to be constructed shall require a
decommissioning plan that includes removal of the solar farm
equipment within twelve months after cessation of
operations. The decommissioning plan shall be submitted to
the county commission by an owner or operator of the
proposed solar farm before construction begins.
Decommissioning costs shall be calculated by an engineer
licensed in the state. As part of the decommissioning plan,
an owner or an operator shall post a bond in an amount of
one hundred and twenty-five percent of the estimated
decommissioning costs. The decommissioning plan shall be
updated every five years by the owner or operator and
submitted to the county commission.
137.100. 1. The following subjects are exempt from
taxation for state, county or local purposes:
(1) Lands and other property belonging to this state;
(2) Lands and other property belonging to any city,
county or other political subdivision in this state,
including market houses, town halls and other public
structures, with their furniture and equipments, and on
public squares and lots kept open for health, use or
ornament;
(3) Nonprofit cemeteries;

SB 879 5
(4) The real estate and tangible personal property
which is used exclusively for agricultural or horticultural
societies organized in this state, including not-for-profit
agribusiness associations;
(5) All property, real and personal, actually and
regularly used exclusively for religious worship, for
schools and colleges, or for purposes purely charitable and
not held for private or corporate profit, except that the
exemption herein granted does not include real property not
actually used or occupied for the purpose of the
organization but held or used as investment even though the
income or rentals received therefrom is used wholly for
religious, educational or charitable purposes;
(6) Household goods, furniture, wearing apparel and
articles of personal use and adornment, as defined by the
state tax commission, owned and used by a person in [his]
such person's home or dwelling place;
(7) Motor vehicles leased for a period of at least one
year to this state or to any city, county, or political
subdivision or to any religious, educational, or charitable
organization which has obtained an exemption from the
payment of federal income taxes, provided the motor vehicles
are used exclusively for religious, educational, or
charitable purposes;
(8) Real or personal property leased or otherwise
transferred by an interstate compact agency created pursuant
to sections 70.370 to 70.430 or sections 238.010 to 238.100
to another for which or whom such property is not exempt
when immediately after the lease or transfer, the interstate
compact agency enters into a leaseback or other agreement
that directly or indirectly gives such interstate compact
agency a right to use, control, and possess the property;

SB 879 6
provided, however, that in the event of a conveyance of such
property, the interstate compact agency must retain an
option to purchase the property at a future date or, within
the limitations period for reverters, the property must
revert back to the interstate compact agency. Property will
no longer be exempt under this subdivision in the event of a
conveyance as of the date, if any, when:
(a) The right of the interstate compact agency to use,
control, and possess the property is terminated;
(b) The interstate compact agency no longer has an
option to purchase or otherwise acquire the property; and
(c) There are no provisions for reverter of the
property within the limitation period for reverters; and
(9) All property, real and personal, belonging to
veterans' organizations. As used in this section,
"veterans' organization" means any organization of veterans
with a congressional charter, that is incorporated in this
state, and that is exempt from taxation under section
501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended[;
(10) Solar energy systems not held for resale].
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section or any other provision of law to the contrary,
solar energy systems constructed for exclusive use of a
single property may be exempt at the discretion of the
assessor.
137.124. 1. Beginning January 1, 2027, for purposes
of assessing all real property, excluding land, or tangible
personal property associated with a project that uses solar
energy directly to generate electricity and that was built
or was contracted to sell power, the tax liability actually
owed shall be equal to six thousand dollars per megawatt of
nameplate capacity and shall be adjusted for inflation

SB 879 7
annually based on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers in the Midwest Region, as recorded by the United
Bureau of Labor Statistics.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prohibit a project from engaging in enhanced enterprise zone
agreements under sections 135.950 to 135.973 or similar tax
abatement agreements with state or local officials or to
affect any existing enhanced enterprise zone agreements.
3. Beginning January 1, 2027, for the purposes of
assessing land that is associated with a project that uses
solar energy directly to generate electricity, such real
property shall be classified as subclass (3) real property
and assessed as commercial property under this chapter.
153.030. 1. All bridges over streams dividing this
state from any other state owned, used, leased or otherwise
controlled by any person, corporation, railroad company or
joint stock company, and all bridges across or over
navigable streams within this state, where the charge is
made for crossing the same, which are now constructed, which
are in the course of construction, or which shall hereafter
be constructed, and all property, real and tangible
personal, owned, used, leased or otherwise controlled by
telegraph, telephone, electric power and light companies,
electric transmission lines, pipeline companies and express
companies shall be subject to taxation for state, county,
municipal and other local purposes to the same extent as the
property of private persons.
2. [And] Taxes levied [thereon] under subsection 1 of
this section shall be levied and collected in the manner as
is now or may hereafter be provided by law for the taxation
of railroad property in this state, and county commissions,
county boards of equalization and the state tax commission

SB 879 8
are hereby required to perform the same duties and are given
the same powers, including punitive powers, in assessing,
equalizing and adjusting the taxes on the property set forth
in this section as the county commissions and boards of
equalization and state tax commission have or may hereafter
be empowered with, in assessing, equalizing, and adjusting
the taxes on railroad property; and an authorized officer of
any such bridge, telegraph, telephone, electric power and
light companies, electric transmission lines, pipeline
companies, or express company or the owner of any such toll
bridge, is hereby required to render reports of the property
of such bridge, telegraph, telephone, electric power and
light companies, electric transmission lines, pipeline
companies, or express companies in like manner as the
authorized officer of the railroad company is now or may
hereafter be required to render for the taxation of railroad
property.
3. On or before the fifteenth day of April in the year
1946 and each year thereafter an authorized officer of each
such company shall furnish the state tax commission and
county clerks a report, duly subscribed and sworn to by such
authorized officer, which is like in nature and purpose to
the reports required of railroads under chapter 151 showing
the full amount of all real and tangible personal property
owned, used, leased or otherwise controlled by each such
company on January first of the year in which the report is
due.
4. If any telephone company assessed pursuant to
chapter 153 has a microwave relay station or stations in a
county in which it has no wire mileage but has wire mileage
in another county, then, for purposes of apportioning the
assessed value of the distributable property of such

SB 879 9
companies, the straight line distance between such microwave
relay stations shall constitute miles of wire. In the event
that any public utility company assessed pursuant to this
chapter has no distributable property which physically
traverses the counties in which it operates, then the
assessed value of the distributable property of such company
shall be apportioned to the physical location of the
distributable property.
5. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, beginning January 1, 2019, a telephone company
shall make a one-time election within the tax year to be
assessed:
(a) Using the methodology for property tax purposes as
provided under this section; or
(b) Using the methodology for property tax purposes as
provided under this section for property consisting of land
and buildings and be assessed for all other property
exclusively using the methodology utilized under section
137.122.
If a telephone company begins operations, including a merger
of multiple telephone companies, after August 28, 2018, it
shall make its one-time election to be assessed using the
methodology for property tax purposes as described under
paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection within
the year in which the telephone company begins its
operations. A telephone company that fails to make a timely
election shall be deemed to have elected to be assessed
using the methodology for property tax purposes as provided
under subsections 1 to 4 of this section.

SB 879 10
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to change the original assessment jurisdiction of
the state tax commission.
(3) Nothing in subdivision (1) of this subsection
shall be construed as applying to any other utility.
(4) (a) The provisions of this subdivision shall
ensure that school districts may avoid any fiscal impact as
a result of a telephone company being assessed under the
provisions of paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection. If a school district's current operating levy
is below the greater of its most recent voter-approved tax
rate or the most recent voter-approved tax rate as adjusted
under subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of section 137.073, it
shall comply with section 137.073.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2019, any school district
currently operating at a tax rate equal to the greater of
the most recent voter-approved tax rate or the most recent
voter-approved tax rate as adjusted under subdivision (2) of
subsection 5 of section 137.073 that receives less tax
100 revenue from a specific telephone company under this
101 subsection, on or before January thirty-first of the year
102 following the tax year in which the school district received
103 less revenue from a specific telephone company, may by
104 resolution of the school board impose a fee, as determined
105 under this subsection, in order to obtain such revenue. The
106 resolution shall include all facts that support the
107 imposition of the fee. If the school district receives
108 voter approval to raise its tax rate, the district shall no
109 longer impose the fee authorized in this paragraph.
110 (c) Any fee imposed under paragraph (b) of this
111 subdivision shall be determined by taking the difference
112 between the tax revenue the telephone company paid in the

SB 879 11
113 tax year in question and the tax revenue the telephone
114 company would have paid in such year had it not made an
115 election under subdivision (1) of this subsection, which
116 shall be calculated by taking the telephone company
117 valuations in the tax year in question, as determined by the
118 state tax commission under paragraph (d) of this
119 subdivision, and applying such valuations to the
120 apportionment process in subsection 2 of section 151.150.
121 The school district shall issue a billing, as provided in
122 this subdivision, to any such telephone company. A
123 telephone company shall have forty-five days after receipt
124 of a billing to remit its payment of its portion of the fees
125 to the school district. Notwithstanding any other provision
126 of law, the issuance or receipt of such fee shall not be
127 used:
128 a. In determining the amount of state aid that a
129 school district receives under section 163.031;
130 b. In determining the amount that may be collected
131 under a property tax levy by such district; or
132 c. For any other purpose.
133 For the purposes of accounting, a telephone company that
134 issues a payment to a school district under this subsection
135 shall treat such payment as a tax.
136 (d) When establishing the valuation of a telephone
137 company assessed under paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of
138 this subsection, the state tax commission shall also
139 determine the difference between the assessed value of a
140 telephone company if:
141 a. Assessed under paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of
142 this subsection; and

SB 879 12
143 b. Assessed exclusively under subsections 1 to 4 of
144 this section.
145 The state tax commission shall then apportion such amount to
146 each county and provide such information to any school
147 district making a request for such information.
148 (e) This subsection shall expire when no school
149 district is eligible for a fee.
150 6. (1) If any public utility company assessed
151 pursuant to this chapter has ownership of any real or
152 personal property associated with a project which uses solar
153 or wind energy directly to generate electricity, such solar
154 or wind energy project property shall be valued and taxed by
155 any local authorities having jurisdiction under the
156 provisions of chapter 137 and other relevant provisions of
157 the law.
158 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
159 contrary, beginning January 1, 2020, for any public utility
160 company assessed pursuant to this chapter which has a wind
161 energy project, such wind energy project shall be assessed
162 using the methodology for real and personal property as
163 provided in this subsection:
164 (a) Any wind energy property of such company shall be
165 assessed upon the county assessor's local tax rolls; and
166 (b) All other real property, excluding land, or
167 personal property related to the wind energy project shall
168 be assessed using the methodology provided under section
169 137.123.
170 (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
171 contrary, beginning January 1, 2027, for any public utility
172 company assessed under this chapter which has a solar energy
173 project, such solar energy project shall be assessed using

SB 879 13
174 the methodology for real and personal property as provided
175 in this subsection:
176 (a) Any solar energy property of such company shall be
177 assessed upon the county assessor's local tax rolls; and
178 (b) All other real property, excluding land, or
179 personal property related to the solar energy project shall
180 be assessed using the methodology provided under section
181 137.124.
182 7. (1) If any public utility company assessed
183 pursuant to this chapter has ownership of any real or
184 personal property associated with a generation project which
185 was originally constructed utilizing financing authorized
186 pursuant to chapter 100 for construction, upon the transfer
187 of ownership of such property to the public utility company
188 such property shall be valued and taxed by any local
189 authorities having jurisdiction under the provisions of
190 chapter 137 and other relevant provisions of law.
191 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
192 contrary, beginning January 1, 2022, for any public utility
193 company assessed pursuant to this chapter which has
194 ownership of any real or personal property associated with a
195 generation project which was originally constructed
196 utilizing financing authorized pursuant to chapter 100 for
197 construction, upon the transfer of ownership of such
198 property to the public utility company such property shall
199 be assessed as follows:
200 (a) Any property associated with a generation project
201 which was originally constructed utilizing financing
202 authorized pursuant to chapter 100 for construction shall be
203 assessed upon the county assessor's local tax rolls. The
204 assessor shall rely on the public utility company for cost
205 information of the generation portion of the property as

SB 879 14
206 found in the public utility company's Federal Energy
207 Regulatory Commission Financial Report Form Number One at
208 the time of transfer of ownership, and depreciate the costs
209 provided in a manner similar to other commercial and
210 industrial property;
211 (b) Any property consisting of land and buildings
212 related to the generation property associated with a
213 generation project which was originally constructed
214 utilizing financing pursuant to chapter 100 for construction
215 shall be assessed under chapter 137; and
216 (c) All other business or personal property related to
217 a generation project which was originally constructed
218 utilizing financing pursuant to chapter 100 for construction
219 shall be assessed using the methodology provided under
220 section 137.122.
153.034. 1. The term "distributable property" of an
electric company shall include all the real or tangible
personal property which is used directly in the generation
and distribution of electric power, but not property used as
a collateral facility nor property held for purposes other
than generation and distribution of electricity. Such
distributable property includes, but is not limited to:
(1) Boiler plant equipment, turbogenerator units and
generators;
(2) Station equipment;
(3) Towers, fixtures, poles, conductors, conduit
transformers, services and meters;
(4) Substation equipment and fences;
(5) Rights-of-way;
(6) Reactor, reactor plant equipment, and cooling
towers;

SB 879 15
(7) Communication equipment used for control of
generation and distribution of power;
(8) Land associated with such distributable property.
2. The term "local property" of an electric company
shall include all real and tangible personal property owned,
used, leased or otherwise controlled by the electric company
not used directly in the generation and distribution of
power and not defined in subsection 1 of this section as
distributable property. Such local property includes, but
is not limited to:
(1) Motor vehicles;
(2) Construction work in progress;
(3) Materials and supplies;
(4) Office furniture, office equipment, and office
fixtures;
(5) Coal piles and nuclear fuel;
(6) Land held for future use;
(7) Workshops, warehouses, office buildings and
generating plant structures;
(8) Communication equipment not used for control of
generation and distribution of power;
(9) Roads, railroads, and bridges;
(10) Reservoirs, dams, and waterways;
(11) Land associated with other locally assessed
property and all generating plant land.
3. (1) Any real or tangible personal property
associated with a project which uses solar or wind energy
directly to generate electricity shall be valued and taxed
by local authorities having jurisdiction under the
provisions of chapter 137 and any other relevant provisions
of law. The method of taxation prescribed in subsection 2

SB 879 16
of section 153.030 and subsection 1 of this section shall
not apply to such property.
(2) The real or tangible personal property referenced
in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall include all
equipment whose sole purpose is to support the integration
of a wind generation asset into an existing system.
Examples of such property may include, but are not limited
to, wind chargers, windmills, wind turbines, wind towers,
and associated electrical equipment such as inverters, pad
mount transformers, power lines, storage equipment directly
associated with wind generation assets, and substations.
(3) The real or tangible personal property referenced
in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall also include all
equipment whose sole purpose is to support the integration
of a solar generation asset into an existing system.
Examples of such property may include, but are not limited
to, solar panels, solar panel mounting racks, and associated
electrical equipment such as inverters, battery packs, power
meters, power lines, storage equipment directly associated
with solar generation assets, and substations.
4. For any real or tangible personal property
associated with a generation project which was originally
constructed utilizing financing authorized under chapter 100
for construction, upon the transfer of ownership of such
property to a public utility, such property shall be valued
and taxed by local authorities having jurisdiction under the
provisions of chapter 137 and any other relevant provisions
of law. The method of taxation prescribed in subsection 2
of section 153.030 and subsection 1 of this section shall
not apply to such property.
393.172. By March 31, 2027, the public service
commission shall adopt rules applicable to electrical

SB 879 17
corporations that require the entity constructing an
electric transmission line under subsection 1 of section
393.170 for which permission is sought from the commission
on or after the effective date of this section to adhere to
standards to be adopted by such rules relating to
construction activities occurring partially or wholly on
privately owned agricultural land. Such standards shall
address, at a minimum, landowner communication expectations,
expectations with respect to transmission structure design
and placement, wet weather construction and remediation
practices, agricultural mitigation and restoration
practices, construction-related tree and brush clearing,
expectations concerning the use and restoration of field
entrances and temporary roads, and best practices with
respect to erosion prevention. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
393.1120. 1. The total amount of real property
associated with all solar energy projects that are
established in any one county in this state shall not exceed
an amount greater than two percent of all cropland in such
county, as determined by the most recent U.S. Department of

SB 879 18
Agriculture Census of Agriculture, except as authorized
under this section.
2. The county commission or other authorized governing
body may increase the percentage of cropland under
subsection 1 of this section by order, ordinance,
regulation, or a vote of the residents of the county.
3. Any resident of the county shall have standing to
bring suit in a circuit court of proper venue to enforce the
provisions of subsection 1 of this section against a solar
energy project developer if he or she believes that the cap
under subsection 1 of this section has been met.
4. For all solar energy projects built on or after
January 1, 2027, such project shall be subject to setback
distances of at least one thousand feet to the nearest
property boundary, including a residence, church, or school
in existence at the time of construction. Such distances
shall not apply to homeowners who have received a written
agreement that has been signed by all affected property
owners within the setback distance. This subsection shall
not apply to solar energy projects built and operating at
capacity on or before December 31, 2026.
5. A solar energy company shall secure, through
purchase or contract, all property rights or easements
necessary for transmission and interconnection for the solar
energy project to connect to the electrical grid prior to
beginning construction of the solar energy project.
523.010. 1. In case land, or other property, is
sought to be appropriated by any road, railroad, street
railway, telephone, telegraph or any electrical corporation
organized for the manufacture or transmission of electric
current for light, heat or power, including the
construction, when that is the case, of necessary dams and

SB 879 19
appurtenant canals, flumes, tunnels and tailraces and
including the erection, when that is the case, of necessary
electric steam powerhouses, hydroelectric powerhouses and
electric substations or any oil, pipeline or gas corporation
engaged in the business of transporting or carrying oil,
liquid fertilizer solutions, or gas by means of pipes or
pipelines laid underneath the surface of the ground, or
other corporation created under the laws of this state for
public use, and such corporation and the owners cannot agree
upon the proper compensation to be paid, or in the case the
owner is incapable of contracting, be unknown, or be a
nonresident of the state, such corporation may apply to the
circuit court of the county of this state where such land or
any part thereof lies by petition setting forth the general
directions in which it is desired to construct its road,
railroad, street railway, telephone, or telegraph line or
electric line, including, when that is the case, the
construction and maintenance of necessary dams and
appurtenant canals, tunnels, flumes and tailraces and, when
that is the case, the appropriation of land submerged by the
construction of such dam, and including the erection and
maintenance, when that is the case, of necessary electric
steam powerhouses, hydroelectric powerhouses and electric
substations, or oil, pipeline, liquid fertilizer solution
pipeline, or gas line over or underneath the surface of such
lands, a description of the real estate, or other property,
which the company seeks to acquire; the names of the owners
thereof, if known; or if unknown, a pertinent description of
the property whose owners are unknown and praying the
appointment of three disinterested residents of the county,
as commissioners, or a jury, to assess the damages which
such owners may severally sustain in consequence of the

SB 879 20
establishment, erection and maintenance of such road,
railroad, street railway, telephone, telegraph line, or
electrical line including damages from the construction and
maintenance of necessary dams and the condemnation of land
submerged thereby, and the construction and maintenance of
appurtenant canals, flumes, tunnels and tailraces and the
erection and maintenance of necessary electric steam
powerhouses, hydroelectric powerhouses and electric
substations, or oil, pipeline, or gas line over or
underneath the surface of such lands; to which petition the
owners of any or all as the plaintiff may elect of such
parcels as lie within the county or circuit may be made
parties defendant by names if the names are known, and by
the description of the unknown owners of the land therein
described if their names are unknown.
2. If the proceedings seek to affect the lands of
persons under conservatorship, the conservators must be made
parties defendant. If the present owner of any land to be
affected has less estate than a fee, the person having the
next vested estate in remainder may at the option of the
petitioners be made party defendant; but if such
remaindermen are not made parties, their interest shall not
be bound by the proceedings.
3. It shall not be necessary to make any persons party
defendants in respect to their ownership unless they are
either in actual possession of the premises to be affected
claiming title or having a title of the premises appearing
of record upon the proper records of the county.
4. Except as provided in subsection 5 of this section,
nothing in this chapter shall be construed to give a public
utility, as defined in section 386.020, or a rural electric
cooperative, as provided in chapter 394, the power to

SB 879 21
condemn property which is currently used by another provider
of public utility service, including a municipality or a
special purpose district, when such property is used or
useful in providing utility services, if the public utility
or cooperative seeking to condemn such property, directly or
indirectly, will use or proposes to use the property for the
same purpose, or a purpose substantially similar to the
purpose for which the property is being used by the provider
of the public utility service.
5. A public utility or a rural electric cooperative
may only condemn the property of another provider of public
utility service, even if the property is used or useful in
providing utility services by such provider, if the
condemnation is necessary for the public purpose of
acquiring a nonexclusive easement or right-of-way across the
property of such provider and only if the acquisition will
not materially impair or interfere with the current use of
such property by the utility or cooperative and will not
prevent or materially impair such provider of public utility
service from any future expansion of its facilities on such
property.
6. If a public utility or rural electric cooperative
seeks to condemn the property of another provider of public
utility service, and the conditions in subsection 4 of this
section do not apply, this section does not limit the
condemnation powers otherwise possessed by such public
utility or rural electric cooperative.
7. Suits in inverse condemnation or involving
dangerous conditions of public property against a municipal
100 corporation established under Article VI, Section 30(a) of
101 the Missouri Constitution shall be brought only in the
102 county where such land or any part thereof lies.

SB 879 22
103 8. For purposes of this chapter, the authority for an
104 electrical corporation as defined in section 386.020, except
105 for an electrical corporation operating under a cooperative
106 business plan as described in section 393.110, to condemn
107 property for purposes of constructing an electric plant
108 subject to a certificate of public convenience and necessity
109 under subsection 1 of section 393.170 shall not extend to
110 the construction of a merchant transmission line with
111 Federal Energy Regulatory Commission negotiated rate
112 authority unless such line has a substation or converter
113 station located in Missouri which is capable of delivering
114 an amount of its electrical capacity to electrical customers
115 in this state that is greater than or equal to the
116 proportionate number of miles of the line that passes
117 through the state. The provisions of this subsection shall
118 not apply to applications filed pursuant to section 393.170
119 prior to August 28, 2022.
120 9. For the purposes of this chapter, the authority of
121 any corporation set forth in subsection 1 of this section to
122 condemn property shall not extend to:
123 (1) The construction or erection of any plant, tower,
124 panel, or facility that utilizes, captures, or converts wind
125 or air currents to generate or manufacture electricity; or
126 (2) The construction or erection of any plant, tower,
127 panel, or facility that utilizes, captures, or converts the
128 light or heat generated by the sun to generate or
129 manufacture electricity.
130 10. Subject to the provisions of subsection 8 of this
131 section, but notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 9
132 of this section to the contrary, the authority of any
133 corporation set forth in subsection 1 of this section to
134 condemn property shall extend to acquisition of rights

SB 879 23
135 needed to construct, operate, and maintain collection lines,
136 distribution lines, transmission lines, communications
137 lines, substations, switchyards, and other facilities needed
138 to collect and deliver energy generated or manufactured by
139 the facilities described in subsection 9 of this section to
140 the distribution or transmission grid.
Section B. Because of the need to ensure that solar
farms being currently constructed do not cause disruption to
adjoining properties, the enactment of section 67.5350 of
this act is deemed necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is
hereby declared to be an emergency act within the meaning of
the constitution, and the enactment of section 67.5350 of
this act shall be in full force and effect upon its passage
and approval.
✓